New York, session 2025-2026, A6944.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law is 2 amended by adding a new section 1363-a to read as follows: 3 § 1363-a. Warnings for mobile gaming. 1. An entity licensed under the 4 provisions of this chapter which provides gaming services on a website 5 or mobile application shall provide a warning that conforms to the 6 contents of subdivision two of this section at the following times: 7 (a) When a user successfully creates their account; 8 (b) Each time the user logs in to their account after forty-eight 9 hours of inactivity; and 10 (c) Every two hours a user has the website or mobile application open, 11 such time shall be the sum of the time spent using the website or mobile 12 application between different sessions. 13 2. The warning required by this section shall cover the entire screen 14 and, in a legible format, state the following: "WARNING: MOBILE WAGERING 15 CAN BE HIGHLY ADDICTIVE. 16 1. MOST PLAYERS DO NOT PROFIT IN THE LONG TERM. 17 2. PERSONS WITH A FAMILY HISTORY OF ADDICTION MAY BE MORE SUSCEPTIBLE 18 TO GAMBLING ADDICTION. 19 3. GAMBLING ADDICTION DESTROYS FAMILIES AND LIVELIHOODS. 20 4. GAMBLING ADDICTS HAVE AN EXTREMELY HIGH RATE OF ATTEMPTED SUICIDE. 21 5. IF YOU FEEL AN URGE TO CHASE YOUR LOSSES OR UNCONTROLLABLY PLACE 22 BETS THIS IS A SIGN OF GAMBLING ADDICTION. 23 6. YOU CAN VOLUNTARILY EXCLUDE YOURSELF FROM THIS SERVICE IN YOUR 24 ACCOUNT SETTINGS. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10830-02-5 A. 6944 2 1 HELP IS AVAILABLE. IF YOU OR SOMEONE YOU KNOW NEEDS HELP, CALL 1-877- 2 8-HOPENY." 3 3. No entity shall modify the content of the warning in subdivision 4 two of this section. 5 4. An entity shall not permit a person to use their website or appli- 6 cation until such person interacts with a button which states that the 7 person acknowledges the warning. Where the warning is too large to fit 8 on the entire screen, such user shall not be permitted to acknowledge 9 the warning until such user has viewed the entire warning. 10 5. Any entity which fails to display such warning in the manner 11 required by this section shall be liable for a civil penalty of ten 12 thousand dollars per day such warnings are not in compliance with this 13 section. Where the commission determines that an entity has engaged in 14 a persistent course of conduct in violation of this section, the licen- 15 see shall incur a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand 16 dollars per day such warnings are not in compliance with this section. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 18 it shall have become a law.